Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.... $    28,458,588.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated out of any money in the special fund in the State Treasury to the credit of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services which are collected by or otherwise become available for the purpose of defraying expenses of the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services as established in Section 27-104-203, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........ $    21,487,878.00. The funds in this section are provided to defray the costs incurred by the Department of Information Technology Services for providing telecommunication services, data center services, and/or other information technology services to state agencies. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for "Personal Services," which includes "Vacancy Funding," for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:               $ 12,451,403.00 Special Funds:               $ 0.00 Total Funds:                 $ 12,451,403.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:            $ 10,775,025.00 Progressions:                $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:             $ 1,676,378.00 Total Personal Services:      $ 12,451,403.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   141 Time-Limited: 0 As used in this section, the term "Personal Services" shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board.  It is the Legislature's intention that no employee's salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of "Personal Services" based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agency's responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for "Personal Services" with the exception of escalated funds.  Further, it shall be the agency's responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for "Personal Services" for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agency's Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change "Personal Services," the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for "Personal Services" for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, "Vacancy Funding" shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026.  These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025.  If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts.  The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that "Vacancy Funding" is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act.  The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level.  Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Service's Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agency's total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agency's discretion as to what headcounts are removed. The Legislature authorized nine (9) new headcounts, which are included in the authorized headcount above for Fiscal Year 2026. New Headcount Authorized: Information Technology Project Management - 3 Statewide Procurement - 3 Public Cloud - 3 SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that the Executive Director of Information Technology Services (ITS) shall have authority to transfer an amount not to exceed Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($750,000.00) to the ITS Revolving Fund (3360900000).  The purpose of this authority is to provide operating cash to alleviate cash flow problems in the ITS Revolving Fund.  Any funds transferred during the fiscal year shall be transferred back to the State General Fund before the end of the lapse period for the fiscal year. SECTION 5.  In addition to all other funds appropriated herein, the following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund, not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Wireless Communication Commission for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026.................................................. .............................................. $ 11,921,851.00. The Wireless Communication Commission shall follow all state procurement and bid laws for all contracts and consultants. SECTION 6.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for "Personal Services," which includes "Vacancy Funding," for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                $ 895,141.00 Special Funds:                $ 0.00 Total Funds:                  $ 895,141.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:             $ 740,910.00 Progressions:                 $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:              $ 154,231.00 Total Personal Services:       $   895,141.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   9 Time-Limited:                0 As used in this section, the term "Personal Services" shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board.  It is the Legislature's intention that no employee's salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of "Personal Services" based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agency's responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for "Personal Services" with the exception of escalated funds.  Further, it shall be the agency's responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for "Personal Services" for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agency's Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change "Personal Services," the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for "Personal Services" for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, "Vacancy Funding" shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026.  These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025.  If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts.  The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that "Vacancy Funding" is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act.  The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration.  The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level.  Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Service's Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agency's total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agency's discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that none of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act for the Wireless Communication Commission (WCC) shall be expended for the purpose of making a payment of any kind or for any purpose, directly or indirectly, to a member of the State of Mississippi Legislature, state official, WCC member, or person who has been a member of the WCC within the last year. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Information Technology Services shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under the provisions of this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of details as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 10.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 11.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is reappropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, for the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services for upgrades, maintenance, and refresh of the Statewide Payroll and Human Resource System (SPAHRS) as authorized in Senate Bill No. 3042, 2024 Regular Session, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........ $     1,500,000.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year.  In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) is provided for Procurement Modernization, improvements to procurement practices, outcomes, and addressing modern challenges. SECTION 13.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Seven Hundred Forty-seven Thousand Six Hundred and Seven Dollars ($747,607.00) is provided to defray expenses incurred in the implementation of the Mississippi Statewide Data Exchange Act, as enacted in Senate Bill No. 2267, 2025 Regular Session, and the Cloud Center of Excellence Act, as enacted in House Bill No. 1491, 2025 Regular Session. SECTION 14.  With the funds appropriated herein, the Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services is authorized to make payments for expenses incurred during prior fiscal years for an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Seventy-six Dollars and Eleven Cents ($2,076.11). SECTION 15.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 16.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.